Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-508
Members of the Legislature; districts;
terms; qualifications; nonpartisan ballot.

The State of Nebraska
is divided into forty-nine legislative districts as provided and described
in sections 50-1153 and 50-1154. The
members of the Legislature from the even-numbered districts shall be elected
for terms of four years at the statewide general election in 1994 and each
four years thereafter. The members of the Legislature from the odd-numbered
districts shall be elected for terms of four years at the statewide general
election in 1996 and each four years thereafter. Candidates for the Legislature
shall meet the qualifications found in Article III, sections 8 and 9, of the
Constitution of Nebraska. The members of the Legislature shall be elected
on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 104;

Laws 2011, LB703, § 1.